Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.080

Participation in insurance plans and contracts—Retired, disabled, or separated employees—Certain surviving spouses, state registered domestic partners, and dependent children.

(1) Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set by the public employees' benefits board:

(a)(i) Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school employees, or retired or disabled employees of employer groups covered by this chapter may continue their participation in insurance plans and contracts after retirement or disablement.

(ii) The retired or disabled employees of employer groups whose contractual agreement with the authority terminates may continue their participation in insurance plans and contracts after the contractual agreement is terminated. The retired or disabled employees of employer groups whose contractual agreement with the authority terminates are not eligible for any subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085;

(b) Separated employees may continue their participation in insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected immediately upon separation from employment;

(c) Surviving spouses, surviving state registered domestic partners, and dependent children of emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty may participate in insurance plans and contracts.

(2) Rates charged surviving spouses and surviving state registered domestic partners of emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or dependent children who are not eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be based on the experience of the community-rated risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022.

(3) Rates charged to surviving spouses and surviving state registered domestic partners of emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or children who are eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be calculated from a separate experience risk pool comprised only of individuals eligible for parts A and B of medicare; however, the premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees and disabled employees shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085, except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section.

(4) Surviving spouses, surviving state registered domestic partners, and dependent children of emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty and retired or disabled and separated employees shall be responsible for payment of premium rates developed by the authority which shall include the cost to the authority of providing insurance coverage including any amounts necessary for reserves and administration in accordance with this chapter. These self pay rates will be established based on a separate rate for the employee, the spouse, state registered domestic partners, and the children.

(5) When a person described in subsection (1)(a)(i), (b), or (c) of this section dies, the authority shall waive the payment of the decedent's premiums and any applicable premium surcharges for the medical, dental, or vision plan for the month in which the death occurred. The authority shall enroll any eligible surviving dependents in the same medical, dental, or vision plan that they had been enrolled in, which shall be made effective on the first day of the month in which the death occurred, and the eligible surviving dependent shall be responsible for the payment of premiums and any applicable premium surcharges for themselves and any other eligible dependents.

(6) The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this section shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

[ 2024 c 185 s 1. Prior: 2023 c 312 s 1; 2023 c 13 s 5; 2018 c 260 s 15; 2015 c 116 s 5; prior: 2009 c 523 s 1; 2009 c 522 s 9; 2007 c 114 s 6; 2001 c 165 s 3; 1996 c 39 s 22; 1994 c 153 s 7; 1993 c 386 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 136 s 6; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 106 s 6; 1973 1st ex.s. c 147 s 7; 1970 ex.s. c 39 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 312: See note following RCW 41.05.083.

Finding—Intent—2023 c 13: See note following RCW 41.05.011.

Intent—Effective date—2007 c 114: See notes following RCW 41.05.011.

Effective date—Application—2001 c 165: See note following RCW 41.05.011.

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Effective dates—1994 c 153: See notes following RCW 41.05.011.

Effective date—1993 c 386 ss 3, 7, and 11: See note following RCW 41.04.205.

Intent—1993 c 386: See note following RCW 28A.400.391.

Effective date—Conditions prerequisite to implementing sections—1977 ex.s. c 136: See note following RCW 41.05.050.

Effective date—Effect of veto—Savings—Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 147: See notes following RCW 41.05.050.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.05.050.